North Carolina, session 2025, HB107.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 103 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 103-19. SUDEP Awareness Week.
The week beginning on the second Sunday in November of each year is designated as Sudden
Unexpected Death in Epilepsy (SUDEP) Awareness Week in North Carolina."
SECTION 2. Article 25A of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-375.7. Seizure awareness training for school personnel.
(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Shannon Leigh Adcock, Steven
Anthony Christos, and Samantha Davis Memorial Act."
(b) It is the goal of the General Assembly to encourage local boards of education to
develop and provide seizure awareness training for all teachers and other school personnel who
may be responsible for students with epilepsy or students that are otherwise predisposed to
seizures."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H107-v-1*